Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1982.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.935, subdivision 2, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-04048 123B.935 ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION SAFETY TRAINING. Subd. 2. Deadlines. (a) Students under subdivision 1, paragraph (a), who are enrolled during the first or second week of school and have not previously received active transportation safety training specified in that paragraph must receive the safety training by the end of the third week of school. (b) Students under subdivision 1, paragraph (b), who are enrolled during the first or second week of school and have not previously received active transportation safety training specified in that paragraph must receive the safety training by the end of the sixth week of school. (c) Students under subdivision 1, paragraph (a) or (b), who enroll in a school after the second week of school and have not received the appropriate active transportation safety training in their previous school district must undergo the training or receive active transportation safety instructional materials within four weeks of the first day of attendance. (d) A district and a nonpublic school may provide kindergarten pupils with active transportation safety training before the first day of school.